Illinois, session 104th, SB3158.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Property Tax Code is amended by changing 5Section 21-27 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 200/21-27)7    Sec. 21-27. Waiver of interest penalty. 8    (a) On the recommendation of the county treasurer, the 9county board may adopt a resolution under which an interest 10penalty for the delinquent payment of taxes for any year that 11otherwise would be imposed under Section 21-15, 21-20, or 1221-25 shall be waived in the case of any person who meets all 13of the following criteria:14        (1) The person is determined eligible for a grant 15    under the Senior Citizens and Persons with Disabilities 16    Property Tax Relief Act with respect to the taxes for that 17    year.18        (2) The person requests, in writing, on a form 19    approved by the county treasurer, a waiver of the interest 20    penalty, and the request is filed with the county 21    treasurer on or before the first day of the month that an 22    installment of taxes is due.23        (3) The person pays the installment of taxes due, in   SB3158- 2 -LRB104 19215 HLH 32660 b1    full, on or before the third day of the month that the 2    installment is due.3        (4) The county treasurer approves the request for a 4    waiver.5    (b) With respect to property that qualifies as a 6brownfield site under Section 58.2 of the Environmental 7Protection Act, the county board, upon the recommendation of 8the county treasurer, may adopt a resolution to waive an 9interest penalty for the delinquent payment of taxes for any 10year that otherwise would be imposed under Section 21-15, 1121-20, or 21-25 if all of the following criteria are met:12        (1) the property has delinquent taxes and an 13    outstanding interest penalty and the amount of that 14    interest penalty is so large as to, possibly, result in 15    all of the taxes becoming uncollectible;16        (2) the property is part of a redevelopment plan of a 17    unit of local government and that unit of local government 18    does not oppose the waiver of the interest penalty;19        (3) the redevelopment of the property will benefit the 20    public interest by remediating the brownfield 21    contamination;22        (4) the taxpayer delivers to the county treasurer (i) 23    a written request for a waiver of the interest penalty, on 24    a form approved by the county treasurer, and (ii) a copy of 25    the redevelopment plan for the property;26        (5) the taxpayer pays, in full, the amount of up to the   SB3158- 3 -LRB104 19215 HLH 32660 b1    amount of the first 2 installments of taxes due, to be held 2    in escrow pending the approval of the waiver, and enters 3    into an agreement with the county treasurer setting forth 4    a schedule for the payment of any remaining taxes due; and5        (6) the county treasurer approves the request for a 6    waiver.7    (c) For the 2019 taxable year (payable in 2020) only, the 8county board of a county with fewer than 3,000,000 inhabitants 9may adopt an ordinance or resolution under which some or all of 10the interest penalty for the delinquent payment of any 11installment other than the final installment of taxes for the 122019 taxable year that otherwise would be imposed under 13Section 21-15, 21-20, or 21-25 shall be waived for all 14taxpayers in the county, for a period of (i) 120 days after the 15effective date of this amendatory Act of the 101st General 16Assembly or (ii) until the first day of the first month during 17which there is no longer a statewide COVID-19 public health 18emergency, as evidenced by an effective disaster declaration 19of the Governor covering all counties in the State. 20    (d) No interest or penalties shall be imposed with respect 21to property that is included in a decedent's probate estate at 22the time of a delinquency if the representative of the 23decedent's estate applies with the county treasurer for a 24waiver of those amounts and is granted that waiver. A waiver 25under this subsection shall apply beginning on the date of the 26decedent's death until the earlier of either (i) the date on   SB3158- 4 -LRB104 19215 HLH 32660 b1which the property is sold, transferred, or conveyed or (ii) 2the date on which the estate is closed. 3(Source: P.A. 101-635, eff. 6-5-20.)